Utah statutes.
57-22-6.   Renter's remedies -- Compliance required -- Notice to owner or
agent-renter entitled to judicial remedy -- Attorney fees.
(1)  A renter is not entitled to the remedies set forth in this section unless
the renter is in compliance with all provisions of Section 57-22-5.
(2)  If a reasonable time has elapsed after the renter has served written
notice on the owner under Section 57-22-4 and the condition described in the
notice has not been corrected, the renter may cause a "notice to repair or
correct condition" to be prepared and served on the owner pursuant to Section
78B-6-805.  This notice shall:
(a)  recite the previous notice served under Subsection 57-22-4(2);
(b)  recite the number of days that have elapsed since the notice was served
and state that under the circumstances such a period of time constitutes the
reasonable time allowed under Section 57-22-4;
(c)  state the conditions included in the previous notice which have not been
corrected;
(d)  make demand that the uncorrected conditions be corrected; and
(e)  state that in the event of failure of the owner to commence reasonable
corrective action within three days the renter will seek redress in the
courts.
(3) (a)  If the owner has not corrected or used due diligence to correct the
conditions following the notice under this section, the renter is entitled to
bring an action in district court.
(b)  The court shall endorse on the summons the number of days within which
the owner is required to appear and defend the action, which shall not be less
than three nor more than 20 days from the date of service.
(c)  Upon a showing of an unjustified refusal to correct or the failure to use
due diligence to correct a condition described in this chapter, the renter is
entitled to damages and injunctive relief as determined by the court.
(d)  The damages available to the renter include rent improperly retained or
collected.  Injunctive relief includes a declaration of the court terminating
the rental agreement and an order for the repayment of any deposit and rent
due.
(e)  The prevailing party shall be awarded attorney fees commensurate with the
cost of the action brought.
(4) (a)  If the renter is notified that the owner intends to terminate the
rental agreement pursuant to Section 57-22-4, the renter is entitled to
receive the balance of the rent due and the deposit on the rental unit within
10 days of the date the agreement is terminated.
(b)  No renter may be required to move sooner than 10 days after the date of
notice.
